Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.190

Eligibility to take test to earn a high school equivalency certificate.

The state board of education shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of a child sixteen years of age and under nineteen years of age to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 if the child provides a substantial and warranted reason for leaving the regular high school education program, if the child was home-schooled, or if the child is an eligible student enrolled in a dropout reengagement program under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

[ 2013 c 39 s 8; 2010 c 20 s 6; 1993 c 218 s 1; 1991 c 116 s 5; 1973 c 51 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.04.135.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 20: See note following RCW 28A.175.100.

Severability—1973 c 51: See note following RCW 28A.225.010.

Waiver of fees or residency requirements at community or technical colleges for students completing a high school education: RCW 28B.15.520.